Maine, session 132, LD1418.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §42, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Reproductive health care. The commissioner may not adopt a rule that places a
ban or restriction on access to reproductive health care, including contraceptives and
fertility treatments that are recognized by the American Society for Reproductive
Medicine, its successor organization or a comparable organization.